Louisiana, session 2026, HB1018.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:81.2 and 281.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§81.2. Limitation on issuance of permits; District 2 of the Louisiana House of
Representatives
A. Beginning on August 1, 2026, and ending on December 31, 2027, no
permits for the sale of alcoholic beverages under this Chapter shall be granted within
the boundaries of District 2 of the Louisiana House of Representatives.
B. (1) This Section applies only to a licensed premises of a Class B or Class
C permit that contains less than five thousand square feet of public habitable floor
area.
(2) This Section does not apply to any of the following:
(a) A licensed premises located within the Shreveport Downtown
Development District.
(b) A licensed premises located within Bossier City.
(c) A licensed premises purchased by the owner of another licensed premises
if the purchased premises is not in violation of any federal, state, or local laws at the
time of acquisition.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1018 ENROLLED
C. Any valid permits existing on August 1, 2026, may continue and be
renewed if the permit holder remains in compliance with all other provisions of law
and local ordinances. However, if the permit holder ceases to operate as a business
or fails to maintain a valid permit for any reason and for any period of time, the
permit holder shall not be eligible to renew the permit. A permit holder shall not be
issued permits for additional locations within the boundaries of District 2 of the
Louisiana House of Representatives.
* * *
§281.2. Limitation on issuance of permits; District 2 of the Louisiana House of
Representatives
A. Beginning on August 1, 2026, and ending on December 31, 2027, no
permits for the sale of alcoholic beverages under this Chapter shall be granted within
the boundaries of District 2 of the Louisiana House of Representatives.
B. (1) This Section applies only to a licensed premises of a Class B or Class
C permit that contains less than five thousand square feet of public habitable floor
area.
(2) This Section does not apply to any of the following:
(a) A licensed premises located within the Shreveport Downtown
Development District.
(b) A licensed premises located within Bossier City.
(c) A licensed premises purchased by the owner of another licensed premises
if the purchased premises is not in violation of any federal, state, or local laws at the
time of acquisition.
C. Any valid permits existing on August 1, 2026, may continue and be
renewed if the permit holder remains in compliance with all other provisions of law
and local ordinances. However, if the permit holder ceases to operate as a business
or fails to maintain a valid permit for any reason and for any period of time, the
permit holder shall not be eligible to renew the permit. A permit holder shall not be
issued permits for additional locations within the boundaries of District 2 of the
Louisiana House of Representatives.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1018 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.